apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.post-tg.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЧШЪЭЮЯҒӢҚӮҲҶабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхчшъэюяғӣқӯҳҷابپتثچجحخديذرزژسشصضطظعغقکگلىمنهیئونكفهؤپءٔآ</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tg-fa.symbols.xml"/>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numbers">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/></l>
	<r><b/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
	<r></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۰</l>
	<r>0</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۱</l>
	<r>1</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۲</l>
	<r>2</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۳</l>
	<r>3</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۴</l>
	<r>4</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۵</l>
	<r>5</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۶</l>
	<r>6</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۷</l>
	<r>7</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۸</l>
	<r>8</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>۹</l>
	<r>9</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <!-- ۰۱۲۳۴۵۶۷۸۹ -->
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <!-- This takes care of years in a very crude manner -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><a/></l>
	<r/>
      </p>
      <par n="numbers"/>
      <par n="numbers"/>
      <par n="numbers"/>
      <par n="numbers"/>
    </e>
  </section>
  
</dictionary>
